Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 12. Detaining witnesses.

No person shall be detained as a witness in any criminal prosecution longer than may be necessary to take his testimony or deposition, nor be confined in any room where criminals are imprisoned.

Cross references. —

As to witnesses in criminal matters generally, see §§

7-11-401

to

7-11-408

.

§ 13. Indictment.

Until otherwise provided by law, no person shall, for a felony, be proceeded against criminally, otherwise than by indictment, except in cases arising in the land or naval forces, or in the militia when in actual service in time of war or public danger.

Cross references. —

As to military courts, see §§

19-12-101

and

19-10-108

.

As to indictments, see Rule 3, W.R. Cr. P.

Rule of supreme court has force

and effect of law and is as “otherwise provided by law.” Barnes v. State, 642 P.2d 1263,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo. 1982).

Thus, prosecution in this state may properly be either by information or indictment.

Barnes v. State, 642 P.2d 1263,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo. 1982).

Prosecutions may be by information.

In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 329, 40 P. 520,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1895).

Omission of victims' names error. —

Omission of the victims' names from the criminal complaint, the criminal warrant, and the information rendered the documents fatally defective, deprived the lower courts of jurisdiction and warranted reversal of conviction of violation of (former) §

14-3-104

. Walker v. State, 847 P.2d 542,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. Mar. 16, 1993).

Failure to file amended information after change of venue. —

Failure of the prosecuting attorney of the county to which a change of venue has been taken to subscribe and file an amended information is a defect which was waived when no motion to quash was made. State v. Kusel, 29 Wyo. 287, 213 P. 367,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1923).

Quoted

in

Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

In re Wright, 3 Wyo. 478, 27 P. 565,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 8

, 13 L.R.A. 748 (1891); Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Limitations on state prosecuting attorney's discretion to initiate prosecution by indictment or by information, 44 ALR4th 401.

§ 14. Bail; cruel and unusual punishment.

All persons shall be bailable by sufficient sureties, except for capital offenses when the proof is evident or the presumption great. Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor shall cruel or unusual punishment be inflicted.

Cross references. —

As to bail upon appeal to district court from decision of municipal court, see §§

5-6-107

,

5-6-203

.

For bail provision, see Rule 3.1, W.R. Cr. P.

Wyoming jurisprudence affords same bail protections as that of United States.

Vigil v. State, 563 P.2d 1344,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 252

(Wyo. 1977).

When right to bail arises in capital offenses. —

In capital offenses right to bail in favor of an accused arises when proof is not evident nor the presumption great. State v. Crocker, 5 Wyo. 385, 40 P. 681,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1895).

A statute providing that no person under indictment for a capital offense shall be admitted to bail is in conflict with this section. State v. Crocker, 5 Wyo. 385, 40 P. 681,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1895).

Under this section, first degree murder being a capital offense, a person charged with that crime is not entitled to bail if the evidence presented on the hearing is such that if presented on the trial it would be sufficient to sustain a verdict of murder in the first degree. Meldrum v. Campbell, 20 Wyo. 87, 121 P. 26,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1912).

For discussion of Wyoming Sex Offenders Registration Act as constitutional,

see Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Accused as serious flight risk. —

The language of this section provides without equivocation that all persons shall be bailable, and it must control the right to bail over Rule 46.1, W.R. Cr. P; the Wyoming constitution does not permit denial of bail on the ground that the accused is considered to be a serious flight risk.
Simms v. Oedekoven, 839 P.2d 381,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1992).

Constitutional guaranty of bail is lost after conviction.

In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 263, 39 P. 875,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1895); State v. Helton, 72 Wyo. 105, 261 P.2d 46,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1953).

A statute providing that a person convicted of a felony, sentence being suspended pending appeal, shall be imprisoned until the appeal is determined does not conflict with this section. In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 263, 39 P. 875,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1895).

Parolee lacks right to bail. —

A parolee who has been arrested and detained on a parole violation warrant has no right to be admitted to bail. Pisano v. Shillinger, 814 P.2d 274,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1991).

It was not improper for officer who issued traffic citation to set bail

for the defendant.
Freeman v. Lusk, 717 P.2d 331,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 524

(Wyo. 1986).

Bail is not excessive merely because defendant is unable to meet it.

Vigil v. State, 563 P.2d 1344,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 252

(Wyo. 1977).

It is not necessary for a court to repeatedly reduce bail to a point that it can be made by the defendant; the measure is adequacy to insure appearance. Vigil v. State, 563 P.2d 1344,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 252

(Wyo. 1977).

Failure to release defendant on bail he could meet, until late date, did not deprive him of fair trial. —

See Vigil v. State, 563 P.2d 1344,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 252

(Wyo. 1977).

Death penalty, if administered in humane fashion, is constitutional.

Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Punishment held not “cruel or unusual punishment.” —

Where a defendant convicted of criminal libel is sentenced to 3 months in jail and to pay a fine of $1,000.00, and to stand committed until such fine be paid, the punishment growing out of a failure to pay such fine is not cruel and unusual within this section providing that cruel or unusual punishments shall not be inflicted. In re MacDonald, 4 Wyo. 150, 33 P. 18,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1893).

This section is not violated by a sentence for contempt imposing a fine of $500.00, and a jail sentence of 6 months and until the fine and costs are paid. Fisher v. McDaniel, 9 Wyo. 457, 64 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1901).

Defendant's life imprisonment for causing the death of a child, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-101

, was not cruel, in and of itself, nor was it unusual, in violation of this section. Johnson v. State, 2003 WY 9, 61 P.3d 1234,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Feb. 18, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 841, 124 S. Ct. 108, 157 L. Ed. 2d 74, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 5710 (U.S. 2003).

Sentence of 17 to 25 years in a case where guilty pleas were entered to third-degree sexual assault and one count of immodest, immoral, or indecent acts with a minor was not disproportionate to the crimes where defendant was accused of touching teenage girls inappropriately for his own sexual gratification; moreover, he was acting like a sexual predator when he groomed the girls.
Hubbard v. State, 2008 WY 12, 175 P.3d 625,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2008).

District court properly denied defendant's motion to correct an illegal sentence because he did not met his burden of proving that the statute under which he was sentence was cruel or unusual where he was 18 at the time he committed a double homicide, his sentence to two consecutive life sentences for first-degree murder was effectively a sentence of life without the possibility of parole, and the defining the age of majority as 19 did not do so for purposes of determining criminal culpability. Nicodemus v. State, 2017 WY 34, 392 P.3d 408,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2017).

Defendant
was not subjected to cruel and/or unusual punishment when defendant
was sentenced to life in prison without the possibility of parole,
pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-306

, upon defendant's
second conviction for sexual abuse of a minor.
Norgaard v. State, 2014 WY 157, 339 P.3d 267,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2014).

Death penalty imposed only with limited discretion. —

In order to satisfy the requirements of Furman v. Georgia, 408 U.S. 238, 92 S. Ct. 2726, 33 L. Ed. 2d 346, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 169 (1972), the sentencing authority's discretion must be guided and channeled by requiring examination of specific factors that argue in favor of or against imposition of the death penalty, thus eliminating total arbitrariness and capriciousness in its imposition. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

Nineteen-to-20 year sentence for involuntary manslaughter constitutional. —

A sentence of 19 to 20 years for the offense of involuntary manslaughter does not violate federal and state bans on cruel and unusual punishment. Daniel v. State, 644 P.2d 172,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1982).

Ten-to-20 year sentence for armed robbery under Wyoming recidivist statute (§

6-10-201

) is constitutional,

under either the
eighth amendment to the United States constitution, or this section of the Wyoming constitution, even though the defendant allegedly deliberately chose to use a nonfunctional gun, unloaded and absent a firing pin, to consciously avoid violence and harm.
Oakley v. State, 715 P.2d 1374,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1986).

Parole prior to expiration of sentence. —

There is no constitutional right to be paroled prior to the expiration of a valid sentence. Dorman v. State, 665 P.2d 511,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 340

(Wyo. 1983).

Denying defendant the ability to receive six months of good time by imposing a minimum sentence of eight years was not cruel and unusual since granting of good time is a matter of grace, not of right. Whitney v. State, 745 P.2d 902,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 538

(Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

State v. District Court, 715 P.2d 191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 501

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

State v. Stern, 526 P.2d 344,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1974); Fortin v. State, 622 P.2d 418,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1981); Price v. State, 716 P.2d 324,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 508

(Wyo. 1986); Sen v. State, 2017 WY 30, 390 P.3d 769,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Todd v. State, 566 P.2d 597,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1977); Apodaca v. State, 571 P.2d 603,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1977); Jones v. State, 602 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Bail in Wyoming Under the Wyoming Rule of Criminal Procedure,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 621 (1970).

For case note, “Is the Current Test of the Constitutionality of Capital Punishment Proper? Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (1982),” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1982).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure—Wyoming Recognizes a Substantive Right to Bail Pending Appeal of Conviction. State v. District Court, 715 P.2d 191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 501

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statute abolishing commercial bail bond business, 19 ALR4th 355.

Sufficiency of access to legal research facilities afforded defendant confined in state prison or local jail, 23 ALR4th 590.

Automobiles: validity and construction of legislation authorizing revocation or suspension of operator's license for “habitual,” “persistent” or “frequent” violations of traffic regulations, 48 ALR4th 367.

Propriety of imposing capital punishment on mentally retarded individuals, 20 ALR5th 177.

Propriety of carrying out death sentences against mentally ill individuals, 111 ALR5th 491.

Application of constitutional rule of Atkins v. Virginia, 536 U.S. 304, 122 S. Ct. 2242, 153 L. Ed. 2d 335, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 4648 (2002), that execution of mentally retarded persons constitutes “cruel and unusual punishment” in violation of Eighth Amendment, 122 ALR 5th 145.

When does forfeiture of real property violate excessive fines clause of Eighth Amendment or state constitutions — State cases, 124 ALR 5th 509.

Propriety of denial of pretrial bail under Bail Reform Act (18 USC § 3141 et seq.), 75 ALR Fed 806.

Propriety, under federal constitution, of evidence or argument concerning deterrent effect of death penalty, 78 ALR Fed 553.

When does forfeiture of currency, bank account, or cash equivalent violate excessive fines clause of eighth amendment, 164 ALR Fed 591.

When does forfeiture of real property violate excessive fines clause of Eighth Amendment — Post-Austin cases, 168 ALR Fed 375.

When does forfeiture of motor vehicle pursuant to federal statute violate excessive fines clause of Eighth Amendment, 169 ALR Fed 615.

Excessive fines clause of Eighth Amendment — Supreme Court cases, 172 ALR Fed 389.

§ 15. Penal code to be humane.

The penal code shall be framed on the humane principles of reformation and prevention.

Cross references. —

As to crimes and offenses generally, see title 6.

Purpose of sentencing. —

A sentence is imposed for one or more of four purposes: (1) rehabilitation; (2) punishment (specific deterrence and retribution); (3) example to others (general deterrence); and (4) removal from society (incapacitation or protection of the public). Wright v. State, 670 P.2d 1090,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1983), reh'g denied, 707 P.2d 153,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 575

(Wyo. 1985).

Sentencing court may consider factors beyond prevention and rehabilitation. —

This section is not so narrowly drawn as to justify conclusion that the only factors which the court may consider in the imposition of sentence are prevention and rehabilitation; the section speaks to the penal code, not to sentencing, and evinces no intent on the part of the constitutional convention to so limit the discretion of sentencing judges in criminal cases. Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Sentence within statutory limits will not be disturbed upon appeal absent clear abuse of discretion.

Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Consecutive life terms constitutional. —

Consecutive life sentences for felony murder and aggravated kidnapping do not violate this section, despite their preventing the defendant from re-entering society for reformation purposes. Castle v. State, 842 P.2d 1060,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1992).

District court properly denied defendant's motion to correct an illegal sentence because he did not met his burden of proving that the statute under which he was sentence was cruel or unusual where he was 18 at the time he committed a double homicide, his sentence to two consecutive life sentences for first-degree murder was effectively a sentence of life without the possibility of parole, and the defining the age of majority as 19 did not do so for purposes of determining criminal culpability. Nicodemus v. State, 2017 WY 34, 392 P.3d 408,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2017).

Humane to impose 10-to-20 year sentence for armed robbery under habitual criminal provision. —

The trial judge imposed a 10-to-20 year sentence for armed robbery under §

6-10-201

(habitual criminal) with the humane principles of reformation and prevention required by this section foremost in mind. Prior to imposing sentence, the trial judge heard testimony from a psychiatrist regarding the defendant's personality disorder and reviewed, in the presence of the defendant, counsel and the jury, the defendant's history of drug abuse, his unhappy family history, the culpability of his past crimes, and the fact that he used an unloaded weapon in the aggravated robbery. Oakley v. State, 715 P.2d 1374,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1986).

Sentence of incarceration for 36 to 72 months for aggravated vehicular homicide not an abuse of discretion. —

Sentencing of defendant, who was 83 years of age and in poor health, upon conviction for aggravated vehicular homicide, to incarceration for a period of not less than 36 months nor more than 72 months, was not an abuse of discretion, nor did it violate Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 15. The district court imposed the prison sentence because of the retribution aspect of punishment, and so as not to depreciate the seriousness of aggravated homicide by vehicle. Cohee v. State, 2005 WY 50, 110 P.3d 267,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2005).

Appropriate care for inmate statutorily, constitutionally, mandated. —

The board of charities and reform has a statutory, as well as a constitutional, duty to provide appropriate care for a penitentiary inmate. One method of fulfilling that obligation is for the board to provide adequate medical care. Apodaca v. Ommen, 807 P.2d 939,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1991).

Suspension of license cruel and unusual punishment. —

Section

31-7-126

(former) and § 31-7-128(f), which provide for the loss of driver's license for individuals less than 19 years of age when convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, inflicts cruel and unusual punishment upon persons subjected to the provisions in violation of the Wyoming Constitution. Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

State v. Stern, 526 P.2d 344,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1974); Fortin v. State, 622 P.2d 418,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1981); Jessen v. State, 622 P.2d 1374,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Moore v. Jarvis, 44 Wyo. 92, 8 P.2d 818,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1932); Todd v. State, 566 P.2d 597,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1977); Jones v. State, 602 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1979); Daniel v. State, 644 P.2d 172,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1982); Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983); Martin v. State, 720 P.2d 894,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 570

(Wyo. 1986); Green v. State, 784 P.2d 1360,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1989); Moehr v. State, 13 P.3d 1114,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

§ 16. Conduct of jails.

No person arrested and confined in jail shall be treated with unnecessary rigor. The erection of safe and comfortable prisons, and inspection of prisons, and the humane treatment of prisoners shall be provided for.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of penal institutions, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to Western Interstate Corrections Compact, see §§

7-3-401

to

7-3-406

.

As to sentence, imprisonment, pardon and parole generally, see §

7-13-101

et seq.

As to county jails, see §§

18-6-201

to

18-6-313

.

As to state penal institutions, see §§

25-2-101

to

25-4-103

.

Obligation to provide adequate medical care. —

The board of charities and reform has a statutory, as well as a constitutional, duty to provide appropriate care for a penitentiary inmate. One method of fulfilling that obligation is for the board to provide adequate medical care. Apodaca v. Ommen, 807 P.2d 939,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1991).

Extended segregation of intersexual inmate was not cruel and unusual punishment. —

Following a trial to the court, the court reluctantly found that the defendants, prison officials and others, did not violate an inmate's rights to be free from cruel and unusual punishment, by placing her in segregated confinement for 438 days due solely to her genetically created ambiguous gender, because the inmate was provided with the basic necessities such as food, warmth, and exercise, and the officials were not in disregard of the inmate's and other prisoners' safety, although no precise safety risk was identified. DiMarco v. Wyo. Dep't of Corr., 300 F. Supp. 2d 1183, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2371 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Stated in

Nicodemus v. State, 2017 WY 34, 392 P.3d 408,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of incarcerated mother to retain custody of infant in penal institution, 14 ALR4th 748.

Right of jailed or imprisoned parent to visit from minor child, 15 ALR4th 1234.

§ 17. Habeas corpus.

The privilege of the writ of habeas corpus shall not be suspended unless, when in case of rebellion or invasion the public safety may require it.

Cross references. —

See also ch. 27 of title 1 and Rule 3, Sup. Ct.

One of the provisos of habeas corpus proceedings is to inquire into jurisdictional matters.

State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

And errors not affecting jurisdiction will not be reviewed. —

Mere errors of law in imposing a sentence for contempt, which do not affect the jurisdiction of the trial court, will not be reviewed on habeas corpus. Fisher v. McDaniel, 9 Wyo. 457, 64 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1901).

The regularity of the judgment under which petitioner was imprisoned cannot be impeached by habeas corpus for errors not affecting jurisdiction of the court. Hollibaugh v. Hehn, 13 Wyo. 269, 79 P. 1044,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1905).

Method of drawing jury. —

Habeas corpus cannot question the regularity of the method adopted by the court in drawing and summoning the petit jury by which petitioner was convicted. Younger v. Hehn, 12 Wyo. 289, 75 P. 443,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1904).

Appeal available in child-custody cases. —

An appeal is available from action taken in a habeas corpus proceeding in child-custody cases. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Although denial of petition is nonappealable determination. —

Normally, a person may petition for a writ of habeas corpus again and again to the same or other courts, each denial thereof being a nonappealable determination. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Filing of writ in supreme court in restraint cases. —

A writ of habeas corpus in all restraint cases, including child-custody cases, may be filed in the supreme court of Wyoming although the issuance of a similar writ may have been refused by a district court. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “an opportunity for full and fair litigation” in state court precluding habeas corpus review under 28 USC § 2254 in federal court of state prisoner's fourth amendment claims, 75 ALR Fed 9.

§ 18. Religious liberty.

The free exercise and enjoyment of religious profession and worship without discrimination or preference shall be forever guaranteed in this state, and no person shall be rendered incompetent to hold any office of trust or profit, or to serve as a witness or juror, because of his opinion on any matter of religious belief whatever; but the liberty of conscience hereby secured shall not be so construed as to excuse acts of licentiousness or justify practices inconsistent with the peace or safety of the state.

Cross references. —

See also art. 21, § 25, Wyo. Const.

As to churches and religious societies, see also §§

17-8-101

to

17-8-117

.

Religious belief not violated.

Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 18, and Wyo. Cost. art. 21, § 25, were not violated where the judge was being disciplined for declining to uphold the United States and Wyoming Constitutions by refusing to perform same-sex marriages, not due to her religious beliefs. Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 639, 199 L. Ed. 2d 527, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 103 (U.S. 2018).

Drug laws. —

Defendant challenging state drug laws on free exercise grounds failed to establish that statutes were anything other than valid and neutral laws of general applicability. Trujillo v. State, 2 P.3d 567,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Williams v. Eaton, 310 F. Supp. 1342, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12370 (D. Wyo. 1970).

Cited

in

Williams v. Eaton, 333 F. Supp. 107, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11210 (D. Wyo. 1971); LePage v. State, 2001 WY 26, 18 P.3d 1177,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 34

, 94 A.L.R.5th 777 (Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of clergyman in court as professional attorney to be in clerical garb, 84 ALR3d 1143.

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities, 95 ALR3d 1000.

Validity and construction of statutes or ordinances prohibiting profanity or profane swearing or cursing, 5 ALR4th 956.

Civil liability for “deprogramming” member of religious sect, 11 ALR4th 228.

Leaving or refusing employment for religious reasons as barring unemployment compensation, 12 ALR4th 611.

Religion as factor in child custody and visitation cases, 22 ALR4th 971.

Validity, under federal and state establishment of religion provisions, of prohibition of sale of intoxicating liquors on specific religious holidays, 27 ALR4th 1155.

Judicial review of termination of pastor's employment by local church or temple, 31 ALR4th 851.

Validity, under state constitutions, of private shopping center's prohibition or regulation of political, social or religious expression or activity, 38 ALR4th 1219.

Liability of religious association for damages for intentionally tortious conduct in recruitment, indoctrination or related activity, 40 ALR4th 1062.

Validity of local or state denial of public school courses or activities to private or parochial school students, 43 ALR4th 776.

Validity of guardianship proceeding based on brainwashing of subject by religious, political or social organization, 44 ALR4th 1207.

Invasion of privacy by a clergyman, church or religious group, 67 ALR4th 1086.

Cause of action for clergy malpractice, 75 ALR4th 750.

Liability of church or religious society for sexual misconduct of clergy, 5 ALR5th 530.

Power of court or other public agency to order medical treatment over parental religious objections for child whose life is not immediately endangered, 21 ALR5th 248.

Validity, under state constitutions, of private shopping center's prohibition or regulation of political, social, or religious expression or activity, 52 ALR5th 195.

Free exercise of religion as applied to individual's objection to obtaining or disclosing social security number, 93 ALR5th 1.

First amendment challenges to display of religious symbols on public property, 107 ALR5th 1.

Validity under federal law of prison regulations relating to inmates' hair length and style, 62 ALR Fed 479.

Validity, construction, and application of provisions of § 702 of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e-1) exempting activities of religious organizations from operation of title VII equal employment opportunity provisions, 67 ALR Fed 874.

Constitutionality of teaching or suppressing teaching of Biblical creationism or Darwinian evolution theory in public schools, 102 ALR Fed 537.

Constitutionality of teaching or otherwise promoting secular humanism in public schools, 103 ALR Fed 538.

Validity, construction, and application of Religious Freedom Restoration Act (42 USCS §§ 2000bb et seq.), 135 ALR Fed 121.

Validity and construction of public school regulation of student distribution of religious documents at school, 136 ALR Fed 551.

What constitutes “hybrid rights” claim under
Employment Div. v. Smith, 494 U.S. 872, 110 S. Ct. 1595, 108 L. Ed. 2d 876, 1990 U.S. LEXIS 2021 (U.S.), reh'g denied, 496 U.S. 913, 110 S. Ct. 2605, 110 L. Ed. 2d 285, 1990 U.S. LEXIS 2979 (U.S. 1990).

State constitutional challenges to the display of religious symbols on public property. 26 A.L.R.6th 145.

Wearing of religious symbols in courtroom as protected by First Amendment. 18 A.L.R.6th 775.

§ 19. Appropriations for sectarian or religious societies or institutions prohibited.

No money of the state shall ever be given or appropriated to any sectarian or religious society or institution.

Cross references. —

As to general appropriation bills, see art. 3, § 34, Wyo. Const.

As to churches and religious societies, see also §§

17-8-101

to

17-8-117

.

For the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §

17-19-101

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Through the Front Door,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 164 (1965).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of religious holidays, 90 ALR3d 752.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance prohibiting desecration of church, 90 ALR3d 1128.

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities, 95 ALR3d 1000.